Washington statutes.
RCW 19.290.120

Scrap metal license application—Department of licensing to issue license—Display of certificate.

The application, together with the required fee, shall be forwarded to the department of licensing. Upon receipt of the application the department shall, if the application is in order, issue a scrap metal license authorizing the processor, recycler, or supplier to do business as such and forward the fee to the state treasurer. Upon receiving the certificate, the owner shall cause it to be prominently displayed in the place of business, where it may be inspected by an investigating officer at any time. Every license must be issued in the name of the applicant and the holder thereof may not allow any other person to use the license.

[ 2013 c 322 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Implementation—2013 c 322 ss 12-23: See notes following RCW 19.290.100.